test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-zeett_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - zeeʹtt a-stem vävy: # Noun - full paradigm
     zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: zeeʹtt
     zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: zeeʹtt
     zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: zeeʹtt
     zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: zeetta
     zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: zeeʹttest
     zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Com+Indef: zeeʹttin
     zeeʹtt+N+Ess+Indef: zeeʹtten
     zeeʹtt+N+Par+Indef: zeeʹtted
     zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [zeeʹttʼtaa, zeeʹttʼtää]
     zeeʹtt+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: zeeʹtt
     zeeʹtt+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: zeeʹtti
     zeeʹtt+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: zeeʹttid
     zeeʹtt+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: zeeʹttid
     zeeʹtt+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: zeeʹttin
     zeeʹtt+N+Pl+Com+Indef: zeeʹttivuiʹm
     zeeʹtt+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [zeeʹttitaa, zeeʹttitää]
